Georgia, session 2025_26, HB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elementary and
secondary education, is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-12, which is reserved, as
follows:
"20-2-12.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'patriotic society' means a youth group listed in
Title 36 of the United States Code as a patriotic society, including the Boy Scouts of
America and its affiliated Georgia groups and councils and the Girl Scouts of the United
States of America and its affiliated Georgia groups and councils.
(b) To encourage schools to facilitate access for students to participate in activities
provided by a patriotic society for the purposes of encouraging civic education, each local
H. B. 198 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 62 0116S
school system that uses state funds to implement programs pursuant to this chapter shall
not prohibit the use of such local school system's facilities by a patriotic society. When a
local school system denies a patriotic society access to a facility of such system, the
principal of the school where such facility is located shall provide in writing reasons for
the denial to a requesting entity. Reserved."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 198 (SUB)
- 2 -